Utah statutes.
75-6-309.   Protection of registering entity.
(1)  A registering entity is not required to offer or to accept a request for
security registration in beneficiary form.  If a registration in beneficiary
form is offered by a registering entity, the owner requesting registration in
beneficiary form assents to the protections given to the registering entity by
this part.
(2)  By accepting a request for registration of a security in beneficiary
form, the registering entity agrees that the registration will be implemented
on death of the deceased owner as provided in this part.
(3)  A registering entity is discharged from all claims to a security by the
estate, creditors, heirs, or devisees of a deceased owner if it registers a
transfer of the security in accordance with Section 75-6-307 and does so in
good faith reliance on:
(a)  the registration;
(b)  this part; and
(c)  information provided to it by affidavit of the personal representative of
the deceased owner, or by the surviving beneficiary or by the surviving
beneficiary's representatives, or other information available to the
registering entity.  The protections of this part do not extend to a
reregistration or payment made after a registering entity has received written
notice from any claimant to any interest in the security objecting to
implementation of a registration in beneficiary form.  No other notice or
other information available to the registering entity affects its right to
protection under this part.
(4)  The protection provided by this part to the registering entity of a
security does not affect the rights of beneficiaries in disputes between
themselves and other claimants to ownership of the security transferred or its
value or proceeds.
